Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-279
County supervisors; oaths; chairman may administer.

The chairman of the board of supervisors shall have power to administer an oath to any person concerning any matter submitted to the board, or connected with their powers and duties.

Laws 1879, § 70, p. 373;

R.S.1913, § 1071;

C.S.1922, § 973;

C.S.1929, § 26-287;

R.S.1943, § 23-279.